California, session 20252026, AB2670.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14124.06 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14124.06. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the department shall convene a task force by no later than January 1, 2027, to conduct a comprehensive assessment of fraud risks in the Medi-Cal program. As part of its assessment, the task force shall review current fraud prevention tools, analyze data-sharing gaps, and evaluate how best practices from the federal government and other states could be applied in California. The task force shall complete its assessment within six months of formation.(b) The task force shall include representatives from the Department of Managed Health Care, the Department of Insurance, county welfare departments, managed care plans, provider groups, and law enforcement.(c) (1) Based on the fraud risk assessment conducted pursuant to subdivision (a), the task force, by no later than January 1, 2028, shall submit recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on all of the following:(A) Uniform statewide protocols for fraud prevention.(B) Proposed regulatory changes.(C) Technology and data analytics improvements.(D) Effective fraud response strategies.(E) Efficient fund recovery strategies.(2) The recommendations submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.